Wyoming statutes. Title 20 Domestic Relations
Article 2. Custody and Visitation
for failing to pay his share of their daughters' college expenses,
and that was an appropriate way to enforce the decree; however, the
district court could not enter judgment in favor of the daughters
because they were not parties to the divorce proceeding. Waterbury v. Waterbury, 2017 WY 11, 388 P.3d 532,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 2017).

Mother properly ordered to pay father's attorney fees. —

When a mother was held in civil contempt for violating a father's visitation rights, the mother was properly ordered to pay the father's attorney fees because
Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 20-2-204(b) and Wyo. R. Crim. P. 42.1 allowed such a remedy.
Shindell v. Shindell, 2014 WY 51, 322 P.3d 1270,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 57

(Wyo. 2014).

Material change in circumstances. —

District court did not err under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 20-2-204(c)
or violate a mother’s constitutional right to familial association by denying her request to end supervised visitation because her choice to discontinue her HIV medication against medical advice supported an inference that she placed her personal interests above those of others, including her child. Taulo-Millar v. Hognason, 2022 WY 8, 501 P.3d 1274,

2022 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 2022).

Res judicata.—

District court’s ruling at the hearing on mother’s fifth motion for order to show cause why the father was not to be held in contempt concluded the issue of the father’s alleged harassment up to that point. Therefore, the district court did not err at the hearing on the mother’s sixth motion when the court announced that the court had already ruled on the mother’s harassment allegation arising from the period before and that it would not revisit that ruling. Heimer v. Heimer, 2021 WY 97, 494 P.3d 472,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 106

(Wyo. 2021).

Father found not in contempt.—

District court did not err when the court found that a father was not in contempt for failing to timely pay the father’s portion of the children’s medical bills because the father remedied the father’s violation by reimbursing the mother for the children’s medical expenses three months before the mother filed a motion for order to show cause. The district court also made it clear that in the future, the father was to pay in a timely manner and not by way of an electronic wire transfer which added cost to the mother’s bank fees. Heimer v. Heimer, 2021 WY 97, 494 P.3d 472,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 106

(Wyo. 2021).

Relocation by custodial parent. —

District court did not abuse its discretion by refusing to change primary custody of the children because it considered the mother’s relocation and clearly had her motives for moving in mind when it made its decision; the district court discussed how the children fared under the original custody order, both before and after the mother’s relocation, and the children’s behavioral, social, and academic issues. Kimzey v. Kimzey, 2020 WY 52, 461 P.3d 1229,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 54

(Wyo. 2020).

Relocation warranted modification of visitation. —

District court erred in declining to modify visitation because the record contained significant evidence showing how the visitation schedule was not working for the best interests of the children; once the district court determined there was a material change of circumstances regarding custody and visitation and the children were being harmed by the current visitation schedule, it had the responsibility to fashion an order in the children’s best interests. Kimzey v. Kimzey, 2020 WY 52, 461 P.3d 1229,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 54

(Wyo. 2020).

Cited

in

Tafoya v. Tafoya, 2013 WY 121, 309 P.3d 1236,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 126

(Oct 2, 2013); Greer v. Greer, 2017 WY 35, 391 P.3d 1127,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. 2017).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Power of court to modify provisions of divorce decree for support of children, as respects past due installments, 6 ALR2d 1277.

Material facts existing at the time of rendition of decree of divorce, but not presented to court, as ground for modification of provision as to custody of child, 9 ALR2d 623.

Alienation of child's affections as ground for modification of custody award, 32 ALR2d 1005.

Right to custody of child as affected by death of custodian appointed by divorce decree; jurisdiction to amend custody provisions, 39 ALR2d 258.

Remarriage of parent as ground for modification of divorce decree as to custody of child, 43 ALR2d 363.

Violation of provision of agreement for decree as to custody of child as affecting provision as to payment for support of child, and vice versa, 95 ALR2d 118.

Child custody provisions of divorce or separation decree as subject to modification on habeas corpus, 4 ALR3d 1277.

Custodial parent's sexual relations with third person as justifying modification of child custody order, 100 ALR3d 625.